Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.19.080 and 2025 c 295 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The application for special parking privileges for persons with disabilities must contain:(a) The following statement immediately below the physician's, advanced practice registered ((nurse practitioner's))nurse's, or physician assistant's signature: "A parking permit for a person with disabilities may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely affects mobility or involves acute sensitivity to light (RCW 46.19.010). An applicant or health care practitioner who knowingly provides false information on this application is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is up to 364 days in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both. In addition, the health care practitioner may be subject to sanctions under chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act"; and(b) Other information as required by the department.(2) A natural person who has a disability described in RCW 46.19.010(1) ((and is expected to improve within 12 months))that is not permanent may be issued a temporary placard for a period not to exceed 12 months. If the disability exists after 12 months, a new temporary placard must be issued upon receipt of a new application with certification from the person's physician as prescribed in RCW 46.19.010(3) and subsection (1) of this section. Special license plates for persons with disabilities may not be issued to a person with a temporary disability.(3) A natural person or veteran who qualifies for special parking privileges under this section must receive an identification card showing the name and date of birth of the person to whom the parking privilege has been issued and the serial number of the placard.(4) A natural person or veteran who qualifies for permanent special parking privileges under RCW 46.19.010 may receive one of the following:(a) Up to two parking placards;(b) One set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed;(c) One parking placard and one set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed; or(d) One special parking year tab for persons with disabilities and one parking placard.(5) Parking placards and identification cards described in this section must be issued free of charge.(6) The parking placard and identification card must be immediately returned to the department upon the placard holder's death.(7) This section expires October 1, 2035.Sec. 2. RCW 46.19.010 and 2020 c 80 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A natural person who has a disability that meets one of the following criteria may apply for special parking privileges:(a) Cannot walk ((two hundred))200 feet without stopping to rest;(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition;(c) Has such a severe disability that the person cannot walk without the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;(d) Uses portable oxygen;(e) Is restricted by lung disease to an extent that forced expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than ((sixty))60 mm/hg on room air at rest;(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as class III or IV under standards accepted by the American heart association;(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to automobile emissions that limits or impairs the ability to walk. The personal physician, advanced practice registered nurse ((practitioner)), or physician assistant of the applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity to the others listed in this subsection;(h) Has limited mobility and has no vision or whose vision with corrective lenses is so limited that the person requires alternative methods or skills to do efficiently those things that are ordinarily done with sight by persons with normal vision;(i) Has an eye condition of a progressive nature that may lead to blindness; or(j) Is restricted by a form of porphyria to the extent that the applicant would significantly benefit from a decrease in exposure to light.(2) The disability must be determined by either:(a) A licensed physician;(b) An advanced practice registered nurse ((practitioner)) licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; or(c) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW.(3) A health care practitioner listed under subsection (2) of this section who is authorizing a parking permit for purposes of this chapter must provide a signed written authorization: On a prescription pad or paper, as defined in RCW 18.64.500; on office letterhead; or by electronic means, as described by the director in rule.(4) The application for special parking privileges for persons with disabilities must contain:(a) The following statement immediately below the physician's, advanced practice registered ((nurse practitioner's))nurse's, or physician assistant's signature: "A parking permit for a person with disabilities may be issued only for a medical necessity that severely affects mobility or involves acute sensitivity to light (RCW 46.19.010). An applicant or health care practitioner who knowingly provides false information on this application is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. The penalty is up to ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both. In addition, the health care practitioner may be subject to sanctions under chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act"; and(b) Other information as required by the department.(5) A natural person who has a disability described in subsection (1) of this section ((and is expected to improve within twelve months))that is not permanent may be issued a temporary placard for a period not to exceed ((twelve))12 months. If the disability exists after ((twelve))12 months, a new temporary placard must be issued upon receipt of a new application with certification from the person's physician as prescribed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section. Special license plates for persons with disabilities may not be issued to a person with a temporary disability.(6) A natural person who qualifies for special parking privileges under this section must receive an identification card showing the name and date of birth of the person to whom the parking privilege has been issued and the serial number of the placard.(7) A natural person who qualifies for permanent special parking privileges under this section may receive one of the following:(a) Up to two parking placards;(b) One set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed;(c) One parking placard and one set of special license plates for persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed; or(d) One special parking year tab for persons with disabilities and one parking placard.(8) Parking placards and identification cards described in this section must be issued free of charge.(9) The parking placard and identification card must be immediately returned to the department upon the placard holder's death.Sec. 3. RCW 46.19.040 and 2025 c 295 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Parking privileges for persons with disabilities must be renewed at least every ((five))10 years((, as required by the director, by satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of the privileges. Satisfactory proof must include a signed written authorization from a health care practitioner as required in RCW 46.19.010(3) or proof that the applicant satisfies the criteria of RCW 46.19.010(1)(k). Parking privileges for qualifying veterans issued pursuant to RCW 46.19.010(1)(k) or renewed under this subsection, between October 1, 2030, and October 1, 2035, are valid for the entire five-year period)). The director may require satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of such privileges if the director:(a) Determines that verification upon renewal would reduce the fraudulent use of such privileges; and(b) Creates a low-barrier process of verification upon renewal for persons with special parking privileges.(2) The department shall match and purge its database of parking permits issued to persons with disabilities with available death record information at least every 12 months.(3) The department shall adopt rules to administer the parking privileges for persons with disabilities program, including any documentation or materials required under subsection (1) of this section or required for a veteran to satisfy the criteria under RCW 46.19.010(1)(k).(4) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature the number of veterans who qualify and apply for special parking privileges under RCW 46.19.010(1)(k) and receive an identification card and parking placards, special license plates, or tabs as described under RCW 46.19.080 (3) or (4) by December 31, 2026, and by December 31, 2034.Sec. 4. RCW 46.19.040 and 2014 c 124 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Parking privileges for persons with disabilities must be renewed at least every ((five))10 years((, as required by the director, by satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of the privileges. Satisfactory proof must include a signed written authorization from a health care practitioner as required in RCW 46.19.010(3))). The director may require satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of such privileges if the director:(a) Determines that verification upon renewal would reduce the fraudulent use of such privileges; and(b) Creates a low-barrier process of verification upon renewal for persons with special parking privileges.(2) The department shall match and purge its database of parking permits issued to persons with disabilities with available death record information at least every twelve months.(3) The department shall adopt rules to administer the parking privileges for persons with disabilities program, including any documentation or materials required under subsection (1) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. 2025 c 58 s 5096 is repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Except for sections 2 and 4 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. Section 3 of this act expires October 1, 2035.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect October 1, 2035.--- END ---